Arkansas, session 2025, HB1758.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-84-101(8), concerning the definition of
"practice of dispensing hearing instruments" relating to hearing instrument
dispensers, is amended to read as follows:
(8) “Practice of dispensing hearing instruments” means conducting and
interpreting hearing tests for purposes of identifying the type and degree of
hearing loss and making proper recommendations based on those results,
ordering the use of and selecting suitable hearing instruments, making
earmolds or ear impressions, and providing appropriate counseling pertaining
to the selling, renting, leasing, pricing, delivery, and warranty of hearing
instruments;




*JMB518*
03/12/2025 1:56:44 PM JMB518